North Carolina, session 2025, HB1159.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, the sum of one million
two hundred ninety thousand six hundred twenty-six dollars ($1,290,626) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to expand access to Teen Mental Health First Aid training
and Youth Mental Health First Aid training in North Carolina.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1159-v-1*